Hawaii, session 2026, HB685.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Kaʻū, on Hawaiʻi island, has long been a cornerstone of the State's agricultural heritage.  Following the decline of the region's large-scale sugar plantations in the 1990s, Kaʻū successfully transitioned to a diverse range of agricultural enterprises, including fruit and vegetable farming, coffee cultivation, macadamia nut production, and livestock grazing. The legislature further finds that Kaʻū's fertile lands, coupled with its farmers' resilience and adaptability, uniquely position the region to enhance the State's agricultural resilience and contribute meaningfully to the State's food security.  Despite these strengths, Kaʻū's steadfast independence and self-reliance have often led to the region being overlooked for state assistance in farming initiatives. The legislature also finds that to address this disparity and support local farmers, it is necessary to acquire agricultural land in Kaʻū.  Doing so will strengthen local farming operations, promote sustainable agriculture, and advance the objectives of the agribusiness development corporation. The legislature further finds that the agribusiness development corporation's mission is to acquire and manage, in partnership with farmers, ranchers, and aquaculture groups, selected high-value lands, water systems, and infrastructure for commercial agricultural use and to direct research into areas that will lead to the development of new crops, markets, and lower production costs. The legislature believes that, given the unique history of the community of Kaʻū, robust community outreach and legislative oversight are critical to ensuring that the community's needs and aspirations are fully considered.  Therefore, engaging the community in discussions regarding the role of the agribusiness development corporation will help identify the specific types of support, resources, and initiatives that align with the goals of local farmers and uphold the values of the region. The legislature also finds that the agribusiness development corporation is uniquely equipped to provide critical support to farmers in the region through land leasing options, increased agricultural production, access to strategic resources, workforce development, infrastructure enhancements, land preservation, and overall economic growth, while ensuring that local lands remain in local hands by preventing acquisition by foreign buyers. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize the issuance of general obligations bonds and appropriate funds for the agribusiness development corporation to purchase a parcel of land located in Kaʻū for agricultural development identified as tax map key: (3) 9-6-5:63. SECTION 2. The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of financing the purchase by the agribusiness development corporation of a parcel of land identified as tax map key: (3) 9‑6‑5:63, owned by the Ellis Jacob Hester Trust, for agricultural development. SECTION 3. The sum appropriated in section 2 of this Act shall be expended by the agribusiness development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.